ko: 탬버린 장착 유형: 핑거 링; 풋 마운트; 핸드헬드; 멀티 마운트; 로드 마운트; 스탠드 마운트; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al tamburinei: Inel pentru deget; Montare pe picior; De mână; Montare multiplă; Montare pe tijă; Montare pe stativ; Altele
pt-BR: Pandeiro tipo de montagem: Anel de dedo; Montagem no pé; De mão; Montagem múltipla; Montagem em haste; Montagem em suporte; Outro
fr: Mode de fixation du tambourin: Anneau pour doigt; Fixation pour pied; À main; Fixation multiple; Fixation sur tige; Fixation sur pied; Autre
lt-LT: Tambūrino tvirtinimo tipas: Žiedas ant piršto; Tvirtinamas prie kojos; Laikomas rankoje; Kelių tvirtinimų; Tvirtinamas ant strypo; Tvirtinamas ant stovo; Kita
fi: Tamburiinin kiinnitystyyppi: Sormirengas; Jalkakiinnitys; Kädessä pidettävä; Monikiinnitys; Tankokiinnitys; Telinekiinnitys; Muu
sk-SK: Typ montáže tamburíny: Krúžok na prst; Pripevnenie na nohu; Do ruky; Viacúčelové pripevnenie; Pripevnenie na tyč; Pripevnenie na stojan; Iné
el: Τύπος στήριξης ντέφι: Δαχτυλίδι; Στερέωση στο πόδι; Χειρός; Πολλαπλή στερέωση; Στερέωση σε ράβδο; Στερέωση σε βάση; Άλλο
es: Tipo de montaje de la pandereta: Anillo de dedo; Montaje de pie; De mano; Montaje múltiple; Montaje de varilla; Montaje de soporte; Otro
it: Tipo di utilizzo del tamburello: Anello da dito; Supporto da piede; A mano; Supporto multiplo; Supporto per asta; Supporto da stand; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งแทมบูรีน: สวมนิ้ว; ยึดกับเท้า; ถือด้วยมือ; ยึดได้หลายแบบ; ยึดกับก้าน; ยึดกับขาตั้ง; อื่นๆ
de: Befestigungsart des Tamburins: Fingerring; Fußhalterung; Handgeführt; Multi-Halterung; Stangenhalterung; Ständerhalterung; Sonstige
ru: Тип крепления тамбурина: Кольцо на палец; Крепление на ногу; Ручной; Мультикрепление; Крепление на стержень; Крепление на стойку; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže tamburina: Obroček za prst; Namestitev na nogo; Ročno; Večkratna namestitev; Namestitev na palico; Namestitev na stojalo; Drugo
nl: Tamboerijn bevestigingstype: Vingerring; Voetbevestiging; Handmodel; Multimount; Stangbevestiging; Standaardbevestiging; Overig
zh-TW: 鈴鼓安裝類型: 指環; 腳戴式; 手持式; 多功能安裝; 連桿安裝; 支架安裝; 其他
tr: Tef montaj tipi: Yüzük; Ayak montajı; Elde taşınır; Çoklu montaj; Çubuk montajı; Stant montajı; Diğer
en: Tambourine mounting type: Finger ring; Foot mount; Handheld; Multi-mount; Rod mount; Stand mount; Other
vi: Kiểu gắn trống lắc: Xỏ ngón; Gắn chân; Cầm tay; Gắn đa năng; Gắn thanh; Gắn giá đỡ; Khác
zh-CN: 铃鼓安装类型: 指环; 支脚安装; 手持式; 多支架安装; 杆装式; 支架式; 其他
nb: Monteringstype for tamburin: Fingerring; Fotmontering; Håndholdt; Multimontering; Stangmontering; Stativmontering; Annet
hu: Tamburinrögzítés típusa: Ujjra húzható; Lábra rögzíthető; Kézi; Többféleképpen rögzíthető; Rúdra rögzíthető; Állványra rögzíthető; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže tamburina: Prsten za prst; Nožni nosač; Ručno; Višestruki nosač; Nosač za šipku; Nosač za stalak; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип на монтаж на дайрето: Пръстен; Монтаж за крак; Ръчен; Мулти-монтаж; Монтаж за прът; Монтаж за стойка; Друго
pl: Typ trzymania tamburynu: Pierścień na palec; Mocowanie na stopę; Ręczny; Wielopunktowe mocowanie; Mocowanie na pręcie; Mocowanie na statywie; Inny
cs: Typ držení tamburíny: Na prst; Na nohu; Do ruky; Víceúčelové uchycení; Uchycení na tyč; Uchycení na stojan; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da pandeireta: Anel de dedo; Suporte de pé; Portátil; Suporte múltiplo; Suporte de haste; Suporte de tripé; Outro
sv: Monteringstyp för tamburin: Fingerring; Fotfäste; Handhållen; Flera fästen; Stångfäste; Stativfäste; Annat
da: Monteringstype for tamburin: Fingerring; Fodmontering; Håndholdt; Multi-montering; Stangmontering; Stativmontering; Andet
ja: タンバリン取付方式: フィンガーリング; フットマウント; 手持ち; マルチマウント; ロッドマウント; スタンドマウント; その他